Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6058.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 216. (1) Subject to subsection (3), the department shall issue a license or registration for an occupation under this act without examination to an individual if the individual demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the individual meets all of the following at the time of application: (a) Holds a valid license or registration in that occupation from an equivalent licensing department, board, or authority, as determined by the department, in at least 1 other state. For each license or registration described in this subdivision that the individual holds, all of the following must be met: (i) The license or registration is in good standing. (ii) The individual has held the license or registration for not less than 1 year. (iii) There were minimum education requirements and, if applicable, work experience and clinical supervision requirements in effect for licensure or registration in the other state, and the other state verifies that the individual met those requirements for licensure or registration in the other state. (iv) If the other state required an examination for licensure or registration, the individual passed the examination. (b) Has not had a license or registration revoked, and has not voluntarily surrendered a license or registration, in any other state or a foreign country while under investigation for unprofessional conduct. (c) Has not had discipline imposed by an equivalent licensing department, board, or authority in another state. If another state has taken disciplinary action against the individual, the department must determine if the cause for the action was corrected and the matter resolved. If the matter has not been resolved by the other state, the department shall suspend the application process and shall not issue or deny a license or registration to the individual until the matter is resolved. (d) Does not have a complaint, allegation, or investigation that relates to unprofessional conduct pending before an equivalent licensing department, board, or authority in another state or a foreign country. If the individual has a complaint, allegation, or investigation pending, the department must suspend the application process and not issue or deny a license or registration to the individual until the complaint, allegation, or investigation is resolved. (e) Pays all applicable fees. (2) This section does not prevent the department from issuing a temporary license or registration under section 213, issuing a courtesy license under section 1806a, or issuing a license or registration under section 217, 726, 1108(2), 1211, 1806(9), 2013, 2209, or 2623. (3) If the department administers an examination on the laws specific to this state as a part of the license or registration process for an occupation under this act, the department may require an applicant under this section to take and pass an examination specific to the laws of this state before issuing a license or registration for an occupation under this act. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, not later than 90 days after receiving a completed application under this section, the department shall issue or deny the request for a license. (5) This section does not apply to a license issued under an interstate licensing compact applicable to an occupation under this act, does not apply to any licensing criteria established under an interstate licensing compact applicable to an occupation under this act, and does not make an individual who is licensed under this section eligible to be part of an interstate licensing compact applicable to an occupation under this act.